Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1711
Reapplication; restriction.

An applicant shall not file a request for siting approval which is substantially the same as a request which was denied within the immediately preceding two years.

Laws 1991, LB 813, § 11.